Massachusetts, session 194th, S964.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
(a) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, there shall be a special
commission to study and define conditions under which Single-Stair Multi-Family Residential
buildings up to six stories shall be legalized in Massachusetts. The commission shall produce a
building code amendment that allows single-stair multi-family residential buildings of up to six
stories, including measures for mitigating any adverse health and safety impacts unique to single-
stair multi-family residential buildings.
(b) The commission shall consist of 1 member representing the Fire Chiefs Association
of Massachusetts, 2 members of the American Institute of Architects, 1 member who is a
practicing fire engineer representing the National Fire Protection Association, 2 members
representing the Board of Building Regulations and Standards, 1 member representing the
American Planning Association Massachusetts Chapter, 1 member representing the Home
Builders and Remodelers Association, 1 member representing NAIOP, 1 member representing
of 2

the Center for Building in North America, 1 member representing a building official employed
by a municipality with a Class 1 Fire Department, and 1 member representing Abundant Housing
Massachusetts.
(c) The study shall build on the report Legalizing Mid-Rise Single-Stair Housing in
Massachusetts produced by the Harvard Joint Center for Housing Studies, Boston Indicators, and
Utile and shall include, but not be limited to: a technical study into the safety of single-stair
residential buildings compared to two-staircase buildings, and a process map and timeline for
implementation of the building code amendment.
(d) For costs associated with developing the study and its recommendations, $250,000
shall be allocated from the General Fund.
of 2